foma/backups/sakha.lexc
!!!sakha.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols GUESS+ ^TESTGUESS ^VERBGUESS +pos +N +deriv +ag +dim1 +dim2 +dim3 +dim4 +dim5 +nmlz +instr.nom +nmlz2 +nmlz3 +dvb +dvb2 +ag.nom +num +sg +pl +case +nom +acc +part +dat +abl +ins +com +cmpr +poss +1sg +2sg +3sg +1pl +2pl +3pl +vblz +vblz4 +vblz2 +vblz3 .drv.vblz3. +vblz5 +vblz6 +vblz7 +V +tense +pres .tns.pres. +polarity +neg +impf +pst.narr +pst.res1 +fut .tns.fut. .tns.fut.neg. +ptcp.pres +cvb.ant +attd +pers +1 .1sg. +2 .2sg. +3 .3sg. .1pl. .2pl. .3pl.



LEXICON Root

!N ;
!V ;
TEST ;


LEXICON TEST

ба TESTstem;
бабай TESTstem;
GUESS+^TESTGUESS:0^TESTGUESS TESTstem;

LEXICON TESTstem
+deriv:^ка #;
+deriv2:^га #;
+deriv:^бай TESTstem;


LEXICON N
GUESS+^NOUNGUESS:0^NOUNGUESS Nstem;
таба Nstem;
балык Nstem;
лекарство:эмп Nstem;
байхал Nstem;
сурук Nstem;
баай Nstem;
орон Nstem;

LEXICON V
!GUESS+^VERBGUESS:0^VERBGUESS Vstem;
бар Vstem;


LEXICON Nstem

+pos+N:^ Ninfl;
+pos+N:^ NsourceDerivation;


LEXICON NAdjStem

Ninfl ;


LEXICON NsourceDerivation

NNaffix ;
Vaffix ;
NVaffix ;
NominalVaffix ;
NAdjAffix ;


LEXICON NNaffix

+deriv+ag:һыт^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim1:чык^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim2:ка^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim3:чаан^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim4:кай^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim5:ыйа^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz:был^ Ninfl;
+deriv+instr.nom:ах^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz2:лаҥ^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz3:лта^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VNaffix

+deriv+dvb:ыы^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dvb2:һын^ Ninfl;
+deriv+ag.nom:ааччы^ Ninfl;


LEXICON Ninfl

+num+sg:0 Ncase;
+num+pl:лар^ Ncase;


LEXICON Ncase

+case+nom:0 NPossNom;
+case+acc:ы^ #;
+case+part:та^ #;
+case+dat:га^ #;
+case+abl:тан^ #;
+case+ins:нан^ #;
+case+com:лыын^ #;
+case+cmpr:тааҕар^ #;


LEXICON NPossNom

0 #;
+poss+1sg:м^ #;
+poss+2sg:ҥ^ #;
+poss+3sg:а^ #;
+poss+1pl:быт^ #;
+poss+2pl:гыт^ #;
+poss+3pl:лара^ #;


LEXICON Vaffix

+deriv+vblz:лаа Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:тый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:сый Vstem;


LEXICON NVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;


LEXICON AdjVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;


LEXICON NominalVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.ыр Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.ар Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.аар Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:тый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:сый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz5:мсый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz6:рҕаа Vstem;
+deriv+vblz7:рый Vstem;


LEXICON Vstem

+pos+V:^ Vinfl;
!+pos+V:^ VsourceDerivation;


LEXICON Vinfl

Vindic ;


LEXICON Vindic

VfiniteTenses ;
Vptcp ;
Vcvb ;


LEXICON VfiniteTenses

Vpres ;
Vimpf ;
Vfut ;
VpstNarr ;
VpstRes ;


LEXICON Vptcp

VptcpPres ;


LEXICON Vcvb

VcvbAnt ;


LEXICON Vpres

+tense+pres:.tns.pres.ар^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+pres+polarity+neg:бат^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON Vimpf

+tense+impf:ар^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+impf+polarity+neg:бат^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VpstNarr

+tense+pst.narr:быт^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+pst.narr+polarity+neg:батах^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VpstRes

+tense+pst.res1:быт^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+pst.res1+polarity+neg:батах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON Vfut

+tense+fut:.tns.fut.ыах^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+fut+polarity+neg:.tns.fut.neg.ыах^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpPres

+ptcp.pres:ар^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.pres+polarity+neg:бат^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VcvbAnt

+cvb.ant:ан^ #;
+cvb.ant:ан^ Vinfl;


LEXICON VsourceDerivation

VVaffix ;
VNaffix ;


LEXICON VVaffix

+deriv+attd:аахтаа^ Vinfl;


LEXICON VpossNumPers

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.м^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҥ^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.а^ #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.быт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕыт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.лара^ #;


LEXICON VpredNumPers

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.бын^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҕын^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.0 #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.быт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕыт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.лар^ #;


LEXICON NumStem

NumInfl ;
NumSourceDerivation ;


LEXICON NumSourceDerivation

Vaffix ;


LEXICON PronStem

PronInfl ;
PronSourceDerivation ;


LEXICON PronSourceDerivation

Vaffix ;
